Maine, session 132, LD547.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1757, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2 and affected
by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
§1757. Standard for rejection for nonfunctioning equipment; corrosion
A motor vehicle must be rejected for violation of the inspection standard for equipment
if any equipment described in section 1751, subsection 2 does not function sufficiently for
the safety of the general public or is loose and not securely attached to the vehicle.
Notwithstanding any provision of this subchapter to the contrary, a motor vehicle may
not be rejected for violation of any inspection standard for exterior, nonstructural corrosion.
For purposes of this section, "exterior, nonstructural corrosion" means corrosion of a body
component, including corrosion that has resulted in a hole or aperture in the body
component, that does not compromise the integrity of the frame or any mechanical
component of the motor vehicle necessary for safe operation. "Exterior, nonstructural
corrosion" includes but is not limited to corrosion of a hood, trunk, hatch, door, fender,
rocker panel or pickup bed. "Exterior, nonstructural corrosion" does not include corrosion
that affects the interior of the motor vehicle's passenger compartment. The Chief of the
State Police may adopt rules under section 1769 to facilitate the application and
administration of this section.